Nebraska, session 109, LB1021.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1021 LB1021
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-6203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6203 (1) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility
annually shall pay a nameplate capacity tax equal to the total nameplate
capacity of the commissioned renewable energy generation facility
multiplied by a tax rate of three thousand five hundred eighteen dollars
per megawatt.
(2) No tax shall be imposed on a renewable energy generation
facility:
(a) Owned or operated by the federal government, the State of
Nebraska, a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an individual municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric membership association, or a cooperative; or
(b) That is a customer-generator as defined in section 70-2002.
(3) No tax levied pursuant to this section shall be construed to
constitute restricted funds as defined in section 13-518 for the first
five years after the renewable energy generation facility is
commissioned.
(4) The presence of one or more renewable energy generation
facilities or supporting infrastructure shall not be a factor in the
assessment, determination of actual value, or classification under
section 77-201 of the real property underlying or adjacent to such
facilities or infrastructure.
(5)(a) The Department of Revenue shall collect the tax due under
this section.
(b) The tax shall be imposed beginning the first calendar year the
renewable energy generation facility is commissioned. A renewable energy
generation facility that uses wind as the fuel source which was
commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, shall be subject to the tax levied
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 on and after January 1, 2010. The
amount of property tax on depreciable tangible personal property
-2-

LB1021 LB1021
2026 2026
previously paid on a renewable energy generation facility that uses wind
as the fuel source which was commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, which
is greater than the amount that would have been paid pursuant to sections
77-6201 to 77-6204 from the date of commissioning until January 1, 2010,
shall be credited against any tax due under Chapter 77, and any amount so
credited that is unused in any tax year shall be carried over to
subsequent tax years until fully utilized.
(c)(i) The tax for the first calendar year shall be prorated based
upon the number of days remaining in the calendar year after the
renewable energy generation facility is commissioned.
(ii) In the first year in which a renewable energy generation
facility is taxed or in any year in which additional commissioned
nameplate capacity is added to a renewable energy generation facility,
the taxes on the initial or additional nameplate capacity shall be
prorated for the number of days remaining in the calendar year.
(iii) When a renewable energy generation facility is decommissioned
or made nonoperational by a change in law during a tax year, the taxes
shall be prorated for the number of days during which the renewable
energy generation facility was not decommissioned or was operational.
(iv) When the capacity of a renewable energy generation facility to
produce electricity is reduced but the renewable energy generation
facility is not decommissioned, the nameplate capacity of the renewable
energy generation facility is deemed to be unchanged.
(6)(a) On March 1 of each year, the owner of a renewable energy
generation facility shall file with the Department of Revenue a report on
the nameplate capacity of the facility for the previous year from January
1 through December 31. All taxes shall be due on April 1 and shall be
delinquent if not paid on a quarterly basis on April 1 and each quarter
thereafter. Delinquent quarterly payments shall draw interest at the rate
provided for in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted.
-3-

LB1021 LB1021
2026 2026
(b) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility is liable
for the taxes under this section with respect to the facility, whether or
not the owner of the facility is the owner of the land on which the
facility is situated.
(7) Failure to file a report required by subsection (6) of this
section, filing such report late, failure to pay taxes due, or
underpayment of such taxes shall result in a penalty of five percent of
the amount due being imposed for each quarter the report is overdue or
the payment is delinquent, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten
thousand dollars. Beginning January 1, 2027, such penalty shall be
collected by the Tax Commissioner and credited to the Department of
Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund.
(8) The Department of Revenue shall enforce the provisions of this
section. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary for the implementation and enforcement of this section.
(9) The Department of Revenue shall separately identify the proceeds
from the tax, interest, and penalties imposed by this section, shall
retain three percent of such proceeds for the costs of the administration
of sections 77-6201 to 77-6204, and shall pay all remaining such proceeds
over to the county treasurer of the county where the renewable energy
generation facility is located within thirty days after receipt of such
proceeds.
Sec. 2. Section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-6204 (1) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue
received from the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 77-6203 as
follows:
(a) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
community college area in which the renewable energy generation facility
is located; and
(b) The remainder of such revenue shall be distributed to local
-4-

LB1021 LB1021
2026 2026
taxing entities which, but for such personal property tax exemption,
would have received distribution of personal property tax revenue from
depreciable personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel
source.
(2) A local taxing entity's status as eligible for distribution
under subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall not be affected when and
if the net book value of personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source becomes zero. A local taxing entity's status as eligible
for distribution under such subdivision shall be affected by the disposal
of all of the exempt depreciable personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source.
(3) The distribution to each eligible local taxing entity under
subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall be calculated by determining the
amount of taxes that the eligible local taxing entity levied during the
taxable year and dividing this amount by the total tax levied by all of
the eligible local taxing entities during the year. Each eligible
entity's resulting fraction shall then be multiplied by the amount of
revenue available for distribution pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this
section to determine the portion of such revenue due each local taxing
entity.
(4) Counties shall not retain any revenue collected pursuant to
sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 for the costs of the administration of
sections 77-6201 to 77-6204.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall not retain any revenue collected
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 for distribution, use, transfer,
pledge, or allocation to or from the General Fund.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-6203, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
-5-

LB1021 LB1021
2026 2026
are repealed.
-6-